Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4150.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) A state agency shall require every prospective contractor to submit the
attestation described in subsection (2) of this section as part of the prospective contractor’s
bid or proposal. A state agency may not award a contract to a prospective contractor that
fails to submit the attestation, or if the state agency determines that the information sub-
mitted on the attestation is false.
(2) An attestation under this section must be in substantially the following form: “Con-
tractor is not now, and will not be for the duration of any contract with the State of Oregon,
under an agreement with any federal agency to provide transportation services for individ-
uals detained by the federal agency for the purpose of deportation from the United States,
except in accordance with an order of a federal court, not including administrative courts.”
(3) If a state agency ultimately awards a contract to a prospective contractor, the con-
tract must include:
(a) A provision making the contract voidable, at the option of the state agency, if the
state agency determines that the information in the prospective contractor’s attestation is
false or subsequently becomes false;
(b) A provision requiring the prospective contractor to include in any transportation
subcontracts a provision requiring an attestation from the subcontractor substantially sim-
ilar to that described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) A provision making the contract with the prospective contractor voidable, at the op-
tion of the state agency, if the state agency determines that the information in a
subcontractor’s attestation is false or subsequently becomes false.
(4) If a state agency determines that the information in the attestation of a prospective
contractor, a contractor or a subcontractor engaged by a contractor is false or subsequently
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 134

HB 4150
becomes false, the state agency shall disqualify the contractor or potential contractor from
contracting with the state agency for a period of three years from the time of the determi-
nation.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Contractor” means a person to whom a state agency has awarded a contract.
(b) “Prospective contractor” means any person who submits a bid or proposal for a con-
tract with a state agency.
(c) “State agency” means every state officer, board, commission, department, institution,
branch or agency of the state government whose costs are paid wholly or in part from funds
held in the State Treasury.
(d) “Transportation subcontract” means a subcontract for services involving the trans-
portation of humans.
SECTION 2. (1) A state agency that awards a grant to a recipient shall require the re-
cipient to execute an agreement as described in subsection (2) of this section as a condition
of receiving grant moneys.
(2) An agreement under this section must:
(a) Require the recipient to attest, before receiving grant moneys, that the recipient is
not and will not be under an agreement with any federal agency to provide transportation
services for individuals detained by the federal agency for the purpose of deportation from
the United States, except in accordance with an order of a federal court, not including ad-
ministrative courts; and
(b) Require the recipient to repay the grant moneys to the state agency if the state
agency determines that the attestation is false or subsequently becomes false.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Grant” means an award of moneys by a state agency to a person or entity other than
a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, that is made under terms that do not require the
repayment of the moneys unless the recipient breaches specified obligations.
(b) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

[2]